Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 3

Sam Davis Home

4-13-301. Property conveyed in trust — Appointment of trustees.

The tract of land, being the same purchased from O.M. Davis, Jr., in 1927, by the Sam Davis Commission in the name of the state of Tennessee, be and is hereby conveyed in trust to the Sam Davis Memorial Association.

The governor shall appoint, upon recommendation of the Sam Davis Memorial Association, nine (9) persons over the age of eighteen (18) years, who shall constitute the board of trustees of the Sam Davis Memorial Association.

Acts 1931, ch. 92, § 1; 1980, ch. 469, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The Sam Davis memorial association, board of trustees, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§4-29-112,4-29-244.

Acts 2018, ch 782, § 1 provided that pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, §4-13-307, the trust created by Tennessee Code Annotated, §4-13-301 is hereby revoked in part, such partial revocation to apply to the following property:

A parcel of land in the Town of Smyrna, Rutherford County, Tennessee, bounded on the north and west by the remaining land of the Sam Davis Memorial Association (map 27, parcel 6.00), on the east by the west right-of-way for Nissan Drive and on the south by the north right-of-way for Sam Davis Road, being described as follows:

Beginning at a point at the intersection of the north right-of-way for Sam Davis Drive and the west right-of-way for Nissan Drive; thence with the north right-of way for Sam Davis Drive, westerly, 52 feet more or less; thence with a new line severing the lands of the Sam Davis Memorial Association, being parallel with the west right-of-way for Nissan Drive, northerly 678 feet more or less; thence easterly, 275 feet more or less to a point in the west right-of-way for Nissan Drive; thence with the west right-of-way of Nissan Drive, in a southerly direction, 450 feet, more or less to the beginning of a curve to the right; thence with the west right-of-way for Nissan Drive, with a curve to the right, 353 feet more or less to the point of beginning, having an area of 4 acres, more or less.

Acts 2018, ch 782, § 2 provided that § 1 of the act shall be effective only upon the Sam Davis Association obtaining a waiver under the Tennessee Heritage Protection Act from the Tennessee Historical Commission, pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, §4-1-412. lf the Sam Davis Association is granted a waiver, then the property described in § 1 reverts to the Sam Davis Memorial Association and does not revert to this state. The Sam Davis Memorial Association may sell the property and use the proceeds to finance repairs and upkeep of the property remaining in the trust.

4-13-302. Object of trust creation.

The object for which this trust is created is to permit and encourage the Sam Davis Memorial Association to improve and beautify the Sam Davis home and other houses and grounds, in such manner as it may deem best, and to keep them in such high state of improvement and beauty, as will display to the world the respect, love and affection that should ever live in the hearts of an admiring people for their departed boy hero of the Confederacy.

Acts 1931, ch. 92, § 2.

4-13-303. Trustees — Officers — Quorum.

The trustees shall elect one (1) of their members as president and one (1) of their members secretary.

Five (5) members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and the board of trustees is hereby authorized and empowered to enforce such bylaws as may be necessary to put into operation and continual execution the objects and purposes for which this trust is created.

Acts 1931, ch. 92, § 1.

4-13-304. Trustees' tenure — Vacancies.

The trustees appointed as provided in §4-13-301 shall each hold such trustee's office for four (4) years, and until such trustee's successor is appointed and qualified, and all vacancies by death, removal or expiration of term or otherwise, shall be filled by the governor upon recommendation of the Sam Davis Memorial Association as provided in §4-13-301.

Acts 1931, ch. 92, § 4.

4-13-305. Appropriation.

There is hereby appropriated the sum of one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,800) per annum for the maintenance or upkeep, or both, of the Sam Davis home, to be paid out of any funds in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, upon the warrant of the comptroller of the treasury, approved by the president of the board of trustees of the Sam Davis Memorial Association.

Acts 1931, ch. 92, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

4-13-306. Reversion of property — Conditions.

In the event the Sam Davis Memorial Association should at any time fail, neglect or refuse to improve the houses and grounds, and to keep them in a high state of beauty and improvement, then the houses and land and such other improvements as may be upon the grounds shall revert to the state of Tennessee without compensation to the trustees, Sam Davis Memorial Association or other corporation or person. The state shall not be required to pay any money whatever for such improvements as the trustees, Sam Davis Memorial Association or other person or persons may have made upon the houses or lands.

Acts 1931, ch. 92, § 3.

4-13-307. Revocability of trust.

The state may revoke this trust at will.

Acts 1931, ch. 92, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch 782, § 1 provided that pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, §4-13-307, the trust created by Tennessee Code Annotated, §4-13-301 is hereby revoked in part, such partial revocation to apply to the following property:

A parcel of land in the Town of Smyrna, Rutherford County, Tennessee, bounded on the north and west by the remaining land of the Sam Davis Memorial Association (map 27, parcel 6.00), on the east by the west right-of-way for Nissan Drive and on the south by the north right-of-way for Sam Davis Road, being described as follows:

Beginning at a point at the intersection of the north right-of-way for Sam Davis Drive and the west right-of-way for Nissan Drive; thence with the north right-of way for Sam Davis Drive, westerly, 52 feet more or less; thence with a new line severing the lands of the Sam Davis Memorial Association, being parallel with the west right-of-way for Nissan Drive, northerly 678 feet more or less; thence easterly, 275 feet more or less to a point in the west right-of-way for Nissan Drive; thence with the west right-of-way of Nissan Drive, in a southerly direction, 450 feet, more or less to the beginning of a curve to the right; thence with the west right-of-way for Nissan Drive, with a curve to the right, 353 feet more or less to the point of beginning, having an area of 4 acres, more or less.

Acts 2018, ch 782, § 2 provided that § 1 of the act shall be effective only upon the Sam Davis Association obtaining a waiver under the Tennessee Heritage Protection Act from the Tennessee Historical Commission, pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, §4-1-412. lf the Sam Davis Association is granted a waiver, then the property described in § 1 reverts to the Sam Davis Memorial Association and does not revert to this state. The Sam Davis Memorial Association may sell the property and use the proceeds to finance repairs and upkeep of the property remaining in the trust.